Utah statutes.
51-7a-302.   Investment advisory committee -- Duties.

(1)  The investment advisory committee shall:

(a)  review investment reports prepared by the state treasurer's office; and

(b)  monitor portfolio composition and investment performance.

(2)  The committee may prepare and present a report concerning the stability, income, and growth of the funds, if any, to:

(a)  the state treasurer;

(b)  affected beneficiary representatives; and

(c)  other interested parties.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 2006 General Session

